New Jersey, session 222, A2968.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.2017, c.84 (C.18A:7C-5.3) is amended to read as follows: 1.    A school district shall allow a student to wear a dress uniform, or a military sash or stole, issued to the student by a branch of the United States Armed Forces while participating in the student's high school graduation ceremony, if the following requirements are met: a.     the student has fulfilled all of the State and local requirements for receiving a high school diploma, and is otherwise eligible to participate in the high school graduation ceremony; and b.    in the case of a student wearing a dress uniform, the student has completed basic training for, and is an active member of, a branch of the United States Armed Forces. (cf: P.L.2017, c.84, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT Under current law, school districts are required to allow a student to wear a military dress uniform issued by a branch of the United States Armed Forces while participating in the students high school graduation ceremony if the student has: 1.      fulfilled all of the State and local requirements for receiving a high school diploma, and is otherwise eligible to participate in the high school graduation ceremony; and 2.      completed basic training for, and is an active member of, a branch of the United States Armed Forces. This bill amends the law to also require school districts to allow graduating students to wear a military sash or stole issued to the student by a branch of the United States Armed Forces while participating in their high school graduation ceremony if they have fulfilled all of the State and local requirements for receiving a high school diploma, and are otherwise eligible to participate in the high school graduation ceremony. A military sash or stole is worn atop a graduation robe and is issued by a recruiter of the graduates service branch upon enlistment.